District of Columbia statutes.
42-3901

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-219, § 2, 38 DCR 171
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1242, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 45-3201.
For temporary (225 day) addition of this chapter, see §§ 2 to 32 of District of Columbia Real Estate Appraiser Temporary Act of 1990 (D.C. Law 8-228, March 7, 1991, law notification 37 DCR ]).